Ohio, session 136, HB578.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 3701.23 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 3701.23. (A) As used in this section, "health care provider" means any person or government entity that provides health care services to individuals. "Health care provider" includes, but is not limited to, hospitals, medical clinics and offices, special care facilities, medical laboratories, physicians, pharmacists, dentists, physician assistants, registered and licensed practical nurses, laboratory technicians, emergency medical service organization personnel, and ambulance service organization personnel. (B) Boards of health, health authorities or officials, health care providers in localities in which there are no health authorities or officials, and coroners or medical examiners shall report promptly to the department of health the existence of any all of the following: (1) Asiatic choleraAlpha-gal syndrome; (2) As specified by the director, any of the following: (a) Diseases that can spread, directly or indirectly, from person to person; (2) Yellow fever(b) Foodborne and waterborne diseases; (3) Diphtheria(c) Zoonotic and vector-borne diseases, including tick-related diseases and conditions; (4) Typhus or typhoid fever; (5) As specified by the director of health, other (d) Other contagious or infectious diseases, illnesses, health conditions, or unusual infectious agents or biological toxins posing a risk of human fatality or disability. (C) No person shall fail to comply with the reporting requirements established under division (B) of this section. (D) The reports required by this section shall be submitted on forms, as required by statute or rule, and in the manner the director of health prescribes. (E) Information reported under this section that is protected health information pursuant to section 3701.17 of the Revised Code shall be released only in accordance with that section. Information that does not identify an individual may be released in summary, statistical, or aggregate form. Section 2. That existing section 3701.23 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.